Hawaii statutes.
§1-4 Persons and property subject to laws.
The laws are obligatory upon all persons and property within the jurisdiction
of the State. [CC 1859, §6; am imp PC 1869, c 3, §1 (same as PC 1850, c 3, §1);
RL 1925, §6; RL 1935, §6; RL 1945, §5; am L 1955, c 57, §1(b); RL 1955, §1-7;
HRS §1-4]

Cross References

Boundaries, see Const. art. XV.

Concurrent jurisdiction of the State over federal
reservations, see Pub L 86-3, §16(b).

Full faith and credit, judgment of another state, see U.S.
Const. Art. IV.

Hawaii National Park, specific rights reserved to the State,
see Pub L 86-3, §16(a).

Service of process, see §634-21 et seq. and provisions of
particular chapters; HRCP rule 4.

Law Journals and Reviews

The Decision to Disobey: A View of Symbolic Civil
Disobedience. 7 HBJ 5.

Case Notes

Territorial waters, offenses committed on vessels within,
prior to annexation, 1 H. 58; during territorial status, 217 U.S. 234, aff'g 3
U.S.D.C. Haw. 345.

Contracts, what law governs. 3 H. 21; 10 H. 138; 10 H. 614,
622.

Personal property, whether within the jurisdiction, taxation
of. 3 H. 292; 16 H. 396. Compare as to intangibles. 31 H. 264, aff'd 47 F.2d
869; 26 H. 299, 356, aff'd 289 F. 664.

Embezzlement, money received in Hawaii for delivery elsewhere.
5 H. 372.

Divorce, effect of on ownership of insurance policy, what law
governs. 10 H. 117, reh'g denied. 10 H. 562. Compare 132 Cal. 85, app. dis.
188 U.S. 291.

Comity, action on insurance policy within and without the
State, which takes precedence. 14 H. 80, app. dis. 187 U.S. 308.

Federal reservations: Jurisdiction during territorial
status. 19 H. 198; 23 H. 61; 38 H. 188, 198; 4 U.S.D.C. Haw. 62; 142 F. Supp.
666. Divorce, residence on military reservation. 35 H. 461; 37 H. 223; 38 H. 261.

Real estate situated outside State, validity of trust under
will of Hawaiian resident. 46 H. 475, 562, 382 P.2d 920.

Custody of children found within the State. 49 H. 20, 29-31,
407 P.2d 885.

Maritime injuries, effect of admiralty jurisdiction. 49 H.
77, 83, note 2, 412 P.2d 669, mod. and reh'g denied. 49 H. 267, 269-71, 414
P.2d 428.

General laws not applicable to State unless explicitly made
applicable. 51 H. 87, 451 P.2d 809.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next